Idaho statutes. Title 62 RAILROADS AND OTHER PUBLIC UTILITIES
Chapter 6 TELECOMMUNICATIONS ACT OF 1988
§ 62-612. Restriction on withdrawal or discontinuance of service.

A telephone corporation subject to this chapter which provides basic local exchange or message telecommunication service, may not withdraw or otherwise discontinue such service to a local exchange area unless one or more alternative telephone corporations are furnishing the respective telecommunication service or equivalent service to the customers in such local exchange area at the time such service is withdrawn or otherwise discontinued.

A telephone corporation proposing to withdraw or otherwise discontinue the services set forth in subsection (1) of this section to a local exchange area shall file a notice of such withdrawal or discontinuance of service with the commission and shall publish a notice of such withdrawal in a legal newspaper circulated within the local exchange area, and provide such other reasonable notice as may be required by the commission.

Any person or telephone corporation affected by a withdrawal or discontinuance of such services by a telephone corporation subject to this chapter, may within thirty (30) days from the date of publication of the notice apply to the commission to determine whether such withdrawal or discontinuance of service is authorized pursuant to this section.

§ 62-613. Subsidization of certain services not allowed.

A telephone corporation may not subsidize nonprice-regulated telecommunication services with those telecommunication services price-regulated by the commission pursuant to this chapter or to title 61, Idaho Code. The commission shall not require revenues earned from nonprice-regulated services or affiliates to be attributed to basic local exchange services, nor permit expenses incurred in producing the revenues to be attributed to the cost of providing basic local exchange services. Provided, payments to the universal service fund established by state or federal law shall not be considered to be a violation of this section.

§ 62-614. Resolution of inter-telephone corporation disputes.

If a telephone corporation providing basic local exchange service which has exercised the election provided in section 62-604(2)(a), Idaho Code, and any other telephone corporation subject to title 61, Idaho Code, or any mutual, nonprofit or cooperative telephone corporation, are unable to agree on any matter relating to telecommunication issues between such companies, then either telephone corporation may apply to the commission for determination of the matter.

Upon receipt of the application, the commission shall have jurisdiction to conduct an investigation, and upon request of either party, to conduct a hearing and, based upon evidence presented to the commission, to issue its findings and order determining such dispute in accordance with applicable provisions of law and in a manner which shall best serve the public interest.

§ 62-615. Authority to implement the telecommunications act — Suspension of obligations of rural carriers — Promulgation of rules or procedures.

The commission shall have full power and authority to implement the federal telecommunications act of 1996, including, but not limited to, the power to establish unbundled network element charges in accordance with the act.

Upon petition of a rural telephone company with fewer than two percent (2%) of the nation’s subscriber lines installed in the aggregate nationwide, the commission shall suspend the petitioner’s obligations pursuant to section 251(c) of the telecommunications act of 1996. The period of suspension shall be determined by the commission, consistent with the public interest, convenience, and necessity, provided that such suspension shall be for a period of not less than three (3) years nor more than five (5) years. All other suspensions, modifications or exemptions pursuant to the telecommunications act of 1996 shall be committed to the commission’s discretion.

The commission may promulgate rules and/or procedures necessary to carry out the duties authorized or required by the federal telecommunications act of 1996.

§ 62-616. Commission authority to resolve subscriber complaints.

The commission shall have the authority to investigate and resolve complaints made by subscribers to telecommunication services which are subject to the provisions of this chapter which concern the quality and availability of local exchange service, or whether price and conditions of service are in conformance with filed tariffs or price lists, deposit requirements for such service or disconnection of such service by telephone corporations subject to the provisions of this chapter. The commission may, by order, render its decision granting or denying in whole or in part the subscriber’s complaint or providing such other relief as is reasonable based on the evidence presented to the commission at the hearing. Any final order of the commission entered pursuant to this section may be enforced against any telephone corporation by an affected person or by the commission.

§ 62-616A. Duty of telephone company to customers relating to unauthorized charges by a third-party service provider.

If a customer of a telephone corporation, whether subject to the provisions of this chapter or title 61, Idaho Code, notifies the telephone corporation that an unauthorized charge from a third-party service provider has been included on the telephone customer’s bill by the telephone corporation, the telephone corporation shall remove the disputed charge from the bill and shall credit to the customer any amounts for unauthorized charges, whether paid or unpaid, that were billed by the telephone corporation on behalf of the third-party service provider during the period of six (6) months prior to the customer’s notification to the telephone corporation that unauthorized charges from a third-party service provider have been included on the telephone corporation customer’s bill. Nothing contained herein shall restrict the right of the telephone corporation to recover credited charges from the third-party service provider.

§ 62-617. Telephone corporation antitrust liability.

No action under the antitrust laws or any other provision or doctrine of law of the state of Idaho shall lie against a telephone corporation for providing service in compliance with any order of the commission. Provided however, this section shall not apply to the provision of any service for which the commission has approved or acknowledged an election pursuant to section 62-605(1), Idaho Code, except to the extent such service thereafter is the subject of a specific commission order pursuant to title 62, Idaho Code.

§ 62-618. Preemption.

The provisions of this chapter preempt, eliminate, and prohibit any economic, franchise or licensing regulation of telephone corporations subject to this chapter by cities, counties, incorporated or unincorporated areas, special use districts, or any other local governmental entity, of any kind.

§ 62-619. Procedure before commission — Appeals.

In all matters arising under this chapter, which are submitted to the commission for decision, order or review, procedure shall be governed by the commission’s rules of practice and procedure.

Reconsideration of, appeal from, and stay of orders issued pursuant to this chapter shall be governed by law as for orders of the commission in other matters.

§ 62-620. Civil penalty for violation.

Any telephone corporation who violates or fails to comply with any final order, decision, rule or regulation duly issued by the commission pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty of not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each day that the violation continues.

Actions to recover penalties under this act shall be brought in the name of the state of Idaho, in the district court in and for the county in which the cause of action or some part thereof arose, or in which the corporation complained of, if any, has its principal place of business, or in which the person, if any, complained of, resides. Such action shall be commenced and prosecuted to final judgment by the attorney for the commission. In any such action, all penalties incurred up to the time of commencing the same may be sued for and recovered. In all such action, the procedure and rules of evidence shall be the same as in ordinary civil actions, except as otherwise herein provided. All fines and penalties recovered by the state in any such action, together with the costs thereof, shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general account [fund]. Any such action may be compromised or discontinued on application of the commission upon such terms as the court shall approve and order.

§ 62-621. Severability.

If a court of competent jurisdiction shall adjudge to be invalid or unconstitutional any clause, sentence, paragraph, section or part of this chapter, such judgment or decree shall not affect, impair, invalidate or nullify the remainder of this chapter, but the effect thereof shall be confined to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section or part of this chapter so adjudged to be invalid or unconstitutional.

§ 62-622. Regulation of basic local exchange rates, services and price lists.

The commission shall regulate the prices for basic local exchange services for incumbent telephone corporations in accordance with the following provisions:

At the request of the incumbent telephone corporation, the commission shall establish maximum just and reasonable rates for basic local exchange service. Maximum basic local exchange rates shall be sufficient to recover the costs incurred to provide the services. Costs shall include authorized depreciation, a reasonable portion of shared and common costs, and a reasonable profit. Authorized depreciation lives shall use forward-looking competitive market lives. Authorized depreciation lives shall be applied prospectively and to undepreciated balances.

At the request of the telephone corporation, the commission may find that existing rates for local services constitute the maximum rates.

The commission shall issue its order establishing maximum rates no later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the filing of the request unless the telephone corporation consents to a longer period.

An incumbent telephone corporation may charge prices lower than the maximum basic local exchange rates established by the commission. Provided however, upon the petition of a nonincumbent telephone corporation, the commission shall establish a minimum price for the incumbent telephone corporation’s basic local exchange service if the commission finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the incumbent telephone corporation’s prices for basic local exchange services in the local exchange area are below the incumbent telephone corporation’s average variable cost of providing such services.

After the commission has established maximum basic local exchange rates, an incumbent telephone corporation may change its tariffs or price lists reflecting the availability, price, terms and conditions for local exchange service effective not less than ten (10) days after filing with the commission and giving notice to affected customers. Changes to tariffs or price lists that are for nonrecurring services and that are quoted directly to the customer when an order for service is placed, or changes that result in price reductions or new service offerings, shall be effective immediately upon filing with the commission and no other notice shall be required.

The commission shall not regulate the prices for basic local exchange services for telephone corporations that were not providing such local service on or before February 8, 1996. Provided however, such telephone corporation providing basic local exchange services shall file price lists with the commission that reflect the availability, price, terms and conditions for such services. Changes to such price lists shall be effective not less than ten (10) days after filing with the commission and giving notice to affected customers. Changes to price lists that are for nonrecurring services and that are quoted directly to the customer when an order for service is placed, or changes that result in price reductions or new service offerings, shall be effective immediately upon filing with the commission and no other notice shall be required. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection and subsection (1) of this section, telephone corporations that are subject to the provisions of this subsection shall not be required to file tariffs or price lists for basic local exchange services provided to business customers.

The commission shall cease regulating basic local exchange rates in a local exchange calling area upon a showing by an incumbent telephone corporation that effective competition exists for basic local exchange service throughout the local exchange calling area. Effective competition exists throughout a local exchange calling area when either:

Actual competition from a facilities-based competitor is present for both residential and small business basic local exchange customers; or

There are functionally equivalent, competitively priced local services reasonably available to both residential and small business customers from a telephone corporation unaffiliated with the incumbent telephone corporation.

Telephone corporations shall not resell:

A telecommunications service that is available at retail only to a category of subscribers to a different category of subscribers;

A means-tested service to ineligible customers; or

A category of service to circumvent switched or special access charges.

The commission shall determine the noneconomic regulatory requirements for all telephone corporations providing basic local exchange service or designated as an eligible telecommunications carrier pursuant to sections 62-610A through 62-610F, Idaho Code, including, but not limited to, such matters as service quality standards, provision of access to carriers providing message telecommunications service, filing of price lists, customer notice and customer relation rules.

Upon written notice to the commission and to its business customers, and after posting the rates, terms and conditions of its services on the carrier’s public website, a telephone corporation may withdraw any tariff or price list not required to be filed under the provisions of this section, provided:
(a) The carrier continues to maintain the rates, terms and conditions of its services on the company’s public website;

(b) The commission maintains access to such terms and conditions on the telephone corporation’s service; and

(c) Nothing in this section overrides the commission’s existing authority pursuant to section 62-616, Idaho Code, to resolve customer complaints.

§ 62-622A. Commission authority to establish minimum pricing of basic local exchange service.

A telephone corporation may file a petition with the commission alleging that another telephone corporation, not subject to regulation pursuant to title 61, Idaho Code, is offering basic local exchange service to customers in a local exchange calling area at a price below its average variable cost of providing such service in the local exchange calling area. The commission shall, if after hearing it finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the allegations contained in the petition are true, establish a minimum price for basic local exchange service of the telephone corporation in the local exchange calling area, which minimum price shall reflect the telephone corporation’s average variable cost of providing such service.

§ 62-623. Subsidy reform — Universal service — Report to legislature.

The commission shall commence a proceeding to:

Identify and quantify implicit subsidies within the rates of incumbent telephone corporations including, but not limited to:

Access charges paid by intrastate interexchange carriers to incumbent telephone corporations including all of the carrier common line charge;

Above cost rates paid by one (1) class of customers to reduce the price paid by another class of customers; and

Imputation of revenue from nonregulated telecommunications services.

Determine a mechanism for removal of the subsidies from the rates of incumbent telephone corporations and the creation of explicit subsidy mechanisms.

Determine revisions that may be necessary to section 62-610, Idaho Code, regarding universal service in order to comply with the telecommunications act of 1996 and regulations promulgated thereunder.

On or before the first day of December 1997, the commission shall issue a report to the governor and the legislature recommending any necessary or desirable legislation concerning state and federal universal support mechanisms, the removal of implicit subsidies from rates and other telecommunication matters.

§ 62-624. Proceedings prior to enactment ratified.

Commission orders issued prior to approval of this act which relate to duties or authority granted to the commission by the telecommunications act of 1996 are hereby ratified and approved to the extent that such actions conform with the provisions of this chapter and the telecommunications act of 1996.

§ 62-625 — 62-654. Uniform bills of lading act. [Repealed.]